Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3172.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The accessible trail located along the Oxbow of the Nashua River in the J. Harry Rich
State Forest in the Town of Groton shall be designated and known as the Marion Stoddart
Riverwalk in recognition of Marion Stoddart’s contributions to restoring the Nashua River,
spearheading the passage of the Massachusetts Clean Waters Act, founding the Nashua River
Watershed Association, and inspiring generations to safeguard the river and its surrounding
ecosystems through community‑driven conservation education. The Department of Conservation
and Recreation shall erect suitable markers bearing such designation in compliance with the
standards of the department
of 1